Maryland, session 2026, HB0648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
5–5A–09.
(a) (1) The Office shall develop a uniform redetermination process to assist
eligible energy customers who are at least [65] 60 years old in enrolling in energy
assistance programs.
(2) The redetermination process developed under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall be updated annually.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 1 –